North Dakota, session 69, HB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
North Dakota accelerated degree - High - demand occupations .
1. An institution under the control of the state board of higher education may:
a. Offer a North Dakota accelerated degree as an optional substitute for any degree
offered by the institution which prepares a student for a high-demand occupation;
b. Determine annually which degrees offered by the institution prepare students for
a high-demand occupation;
c. Provide a list of North Dakota accelerated degrees to the appropriate
occupational and professional boards; and
d. Not require a student to obtain general education credits for a North Dakota
accelerated degree .
2. Upon review of an individual's application for a license to practice in a profession
designated as a high-demand occupation by an institution under the control of the
state board of higher education, an occupational or professional board shall approve a
North Dakota accelerated degree and recognize the degree as an accredited program
for licensing purposes.
Page No. 1 25.0232.02000